Illinois, session 104th, SB3714.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Mental Health and Developmental 5Disabilities Administrative Act is amended by adding Section 676.3 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 1705/76.3 new)8    Sec. 76.3. BALC annual publications. Beginning January 1, 92027, the Department shall publish annually the assessment 10instruments used by the Department's Bureau of Accreditation, 11Licensure, and Certification to survey and license providers 12of community-integrated living arrangement homes for 13individuals with intellectual or developmental disabilities. 14The Department shall adopt rules to implement this Section.  15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 16becoming law.